Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-268
Authority; property; public; exempt from taxation; when; dissolution; assets; how distributed.

All property acquired or held by the authority to carry out the purposes of the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority Act is declared to be public property. The property to the extent such property is used for a public purpose, all the income from such property, bonds issued under such act, interest payable on such bonds, and income derived from such bonds shall at all times be exempt from all taxes imposed by the state or any county, city, or other political subdivision of the state. The authority may, in the resolution authorizing the issuance of any series of bonds, elect to have the income on such bonds be subject to personal income taxation imposed by the state. If the authority is dissolved, the ownership of any assets remaining after all indebtedness and other obligations of the authority have been discharged shall pass to the state. Notwithstanding that title to a project may be in the authority, such project shall be subject to taxation to the same extent, in the same manner, and under the same procedures as privately owned property in similar circumstances if such project is leased to or held by private interests.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 68;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 65;

Laws 2001, LB 173, § 18.